Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
Intangible Property

385.110.
Bequests of intangible property to minors. [Repealed.]

385.112.
Validity and effect of transfer.

The validity of a transfer made in a manner prescribed in KRS

385.032

to

385.222

is not affected by:

Failure of the transferor to comply with KRS

385.092

(3) concerning possession and control;

Designation of an ineligible custodian, except designation of the transferor in the case of property for which the transferor is ineligible to serve as custodian under KRS

385.092

(1); or

Death or incapacity of a person nominated under KRS

385.032

or designated under KRS 385.092 as custodian or the disclaimer of the office by that person.

A transfer made pursuant to KRS

385.092

is irrevocable, and the custodial property is indefeasibly vested in the minor, but the custodian has all the rights, powers, duties, and authority provided in KRS

385.032

to

385.222

, and neither the minor nor the minor’s legal representative has any right, power, duty, or authority with respect to the custodial property except as provided in KRS

385.032

to

385.222

.

By making a transfer, the transferor incorporates in the disposition all the provisions of KRS

385.032

to

385.222

and grants to the custodian, and to any third person dealing with a person designated as custodian, the respective powers, rights, and immunities provided in KRS

385.032

to

385.222

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 11, effective July 15, 1986.

385.120.
Testator may provide bequest is subject to Kentucky Uniform Gifts to Minors Act. [Repealed.]

385.122.
Care of custodial property.

A custodian shall:

Take control of custodial property;

Register or record title to custodial property if appropriate; and

Collect, hold, manage, invest, and reinvest custodial property.

In dealing with custodial property, a custodian shall observe the standard of care that would be observed by a prudent person, dealing with property of another and is not limited by any other statute restricting investments by fiduciaries. If a custodian has a special skill or expertise or is named custodian on the basis of representations of a special skill or expertise, the custodian shall use that skill or expertise. However, a custodian, in the custodian’s discretion and without liability to the minor or the minor’s estate, may retain any custodial property received from a transferor.

A custodian may invest in or pay premiums on life insurance or endowment policies on:

The life of the minor only if the minor or the minor’s estate is the sole beneficiary; or

The life of another person in whom the minor has an insurable interest only to the extent that the minor, the minor’s estate, or the custodian in the capacity of custodian, is the irrevocable beneficiary.

A custodian at all times shall keep custodial property separate and distinct from all other property in a manner sufficient to identify it clearly as custodial property of the minor. Custodial property consisting of an undivided interest is so identified if the minor’s interest is held as a tenant in common and is fixed. Custodial property subject to recordation is so identified if it is recorded, and custodial property subject to registration is so identified if it is either registered, or held in an account designated, in the name of the custodian, followed in substance by the words: “as a custodian for — (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.”

A custodian shall keep records of all transactions with respect to custodial property, including information necessary for the preparation of the minor’s tax returns, and shall make them available for inspection at reasonable intervals by a parent or legal representative of the minor or by the minor if the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 12, effective July 15, 1986.

385.130.
Designation of custodian. [Repealed.]

385.132.
Powers of custodian.

A custodian, acting in a custodial capacity, has all the rights, powers, and authority over custodial property that unmarried adult owners have over their own property, but a custodian may exercise those rights, powers, and authority in that capacity only.

This section does not relieve a custodian from liability for breach of KRS

385.122

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 13, effective July 15, 1986.

385.140.
Direct bequest to minor. [Repealed.]

385.142.
Use of custodial property.

A custodian may deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor’s benefit so much of the custodial property as the custodian considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor, without court order and without regard to:

The duty or ability of the custodian personally or of any other person to support the minor; or

Any other income or property of the minor which may be applicable or available for that purpose.

On petition of an interested person or the minor if the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years, the court may order the custodian to deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor’s benefit so much of the custodial property as the court considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor.

A delivery, payment, or expenditure under this section is in addition to, not in substitution for, and does not affect any obligation of a person to support the minor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 14, effective July 15, 1986.

385.150.
Distribution of bequest. [Repealed.]

385.152.
Custodian’s expenses, compensation and bond.

A custodian is entitled to reimbursement from custodial property for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of the custodian’s duties.

Except for one who is a transferor under KRS

385.042

, a custodian has a noncumulative election during each calendar year to charge reasonable compensation for services performed during that year.

Except as provided in KRS 385.182(6), a custodian need not give a bond.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 15, effective July 15, 1986.

385.160.
Successor custodians. [Repealed.]

385.162.
Exemption of third person from liability.

A third person in good faith and without court order may act on the instructions of or otherwise deal with any person purporting to make a transfer or purporting to act in the capacity of a custodian and, in the absence of knowledge, is not responsible for determining:

The validity of the purported custodian’s designation;

The propriety of, or the authority under KRS

385.032

to

385.222

for, any act of the purported custodian;

The validity or propriety under KRS

385.032

to

385.222

of any instrument or instructions executed or given either by the person purporting to make a transfer or by the purported custodian; or

The propriety of the application of any property of the minor delivered to the purported custodian.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 16, effective July 15, 1986.

385.170.
Vacancy in custodianship. [Repealed.]

385.172.
Liability to third persons.

A claim based on:

A contract entered into by a custodian acting in a custodial capacity;

An obligation arising from the ownership or control of custodial property; or

A tort committed during the custodianship, may be asserted against the custodial property by proceeding against the custodian in the custodial capacity, whether or not the custodian or the minor is personally liable therefor.

A custodian is not personally liable:

On a contract properly entered into in the custodial capacity unless the custodian fails to reveal that capacity and to identify the custodianship in the contract; or

For an obligation arising from control of custodial property or for a tort committed during the custodianship unless the custodian is personally at fault.

A minor is not personally liable for an obligation arising from ownership of custodial property or for a tort committed during the custodianship unless the minor is personally at fault.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 17, effective July 15, 1986.

385.180.
Duties of custodian. [Repealed.]

385.182.
Renunciation, resignation, death or removal of custodian — Designation of successor custodian.

A person nominated under KRS

385.032

or designated under KRS

385.092

as custodian may decline to serve by delivering a valid disclaimer to the person who made the nomination or to the transferor or the transferor’s legal representative. If the event giving rise to a transfer has not occurred and no substitute custodian able, willing, and eligible to serve was nominated under KRS

385.032

, the person who made the nomination may nominate a substitute custodian under KRS 385.032; otherwise the transferor or the transferor’s legal representative shall designate a substitute custodian at the time of the transfer, in either case from among the persons eligible to serve as custodian for that kind of property under KRS

385.092

(1). The custodian so designated has the rights of a successor custodian.

A custodian at any time may designate a trust company or an adult other than a transferor under KRS

385.042

as successor custodian by executing and dating an instrument of designation before a subscribing witness other than the successor. If the instrument of designation does not contain or is not accompanied by the resignation of the custodian, the designation of the successor does not take effect until the custodian resigns, dies, becomes incapacitated, or is removed.

A custodian may resign at any time by delivering written notice to the minor if the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years and to the successor custodian and by delivering the custodial property to the successor custodian.

If a custodian is ineligible, dies, or becomes incapacitated without having effectively designated a successor and the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years, the minor may designate as successor custodian, in the manner prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, an adult member of the minor’s family, a conservator of the minor, or a trust company. If the minor has not attained the age of fourteen (14) years or fails to act within sixty (60) days after the ineligibility, death, or incapacity, the conservator of the minor becomes successor custodian. If the minor has no conservator or the conservator declines to act, the transferor, the legal representative of the transferor or of the custodian, an adult member of the minor’s family, or any other interested person may petition the court to designate a successor custodian.

A custodian who declines to serve under subsection (1) of this section or resigns under subsection (3) of this section, or the legal representative of a deceased or incapacitated custodian, as soon as practicable, shall put the custodial property and records in the possession and control of the successor custodian. The successor custodian by action may enforce the obligation to deliver custodial property and records and becomes responsible for each item as received.

A transferor, the legal representative of a transferor, an adult member of the minor’s family, a guardian of the person of the minor, the conservator of the minor, or the minor if the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years may petition the court to remove the custodian for cause and to designate a successor custodian other than a transferor under KRS

385.042

or to require the custodian to give appropriate bond.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 18, effective July 15, 1986.

385.190.
Jurisdiction of undistributed property. [Repealed.]

385.192.
Accounting by and determination of liability of custodian.

A minor who has attained the age of fourteen (14) years, the minor’s guardian of the person or legal representative, an adult member of the minor’s family, a transferor, or a transferor’s legal representative may petition the court:

For an accounting by the custodian or the custodian’s legal representative; or

For a determination of responsibility, as between the custodial property and the custodian personally, for claims against the custodial property unless the responsibility has been adjudicated in an action under KRS

385.172

to which the minor or the minor’s legal representative was a party.

A successor custodian may petition the court for an accounting by the predecessor custodian.

The court, in a proceeding under KRS

385.032

to

385.222

or in any other proceeding, may require or permit the custodian or the custodian’s legal representative to account.

If a custodian is removed under KRS 385.182(6), the court shall require an accounting and order delivery of the custodial property and records to the successor custodian and the execution of all instruments required for transfer of the custodial property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 19, effective July 15, 1986.

385.200.
Method for making bequests not exclusive. [Repealed.]

385.202.
Termination of custodianship.

The custodian shall transfer in an appropriate manner the custodial property to the minor or to the minor’s estate upon the earlier of:

The minor’s attainment of age eighteen (18) with respect to custodial property transferred under KRS

385.042

to

385.072

; or

The minor’s death.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 20, effective July 15, 1986.

385.212.
Applicability.

KRS

385.032

to

385.222

apply to a transfer within the scope of KRS

385.022

made after July 15, 1986, if:

The transfer purports to have been made under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act of Kentucky; or

The instrument by which the transfer purports to have been made uses in substance the designation “as custodian under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act” or “as custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” of any other state, and the application of KRS

385.032

to

385.222

is necessary to validate the transfer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 21, effective July 15, 1986.

385.222.
Effect on existing custodianships.

Any transfer of custodial property as now defined in KRS

385.012

made before July 15, 1986, is validated notwithstanding that there was no specific authority in the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act of Kentucky for the coverage of custodial property of that kind or for a transfer from that source at the time the transfer was made.

KRS

385.012

to

385.212

apply to all transfers made before July 15, 1986, in a manner and form prescribed in the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act of Kentucky, except insofar as the application impairs constitutionally vested rights.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 22, effective July 15, 1986.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Minors, § 30.14.

385.232.
Uniformity of application and construction.

KRS

385.012

to

385.242

shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of KRS

385.012

to

385.242

among states enacting it.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 23, effective July 15, 1986.

385.242.
Severability.

To the extent that KRS

385.012

to

385.232

, by virtue of KRS 385.222(2), does not apply to transfers made in a manner prescribed in the Gifts to Minors Act of Kentucky or to the powers, duties, and immunities conferred by transfers in that manner upon custodians and persons dealing with custodians, the repeal of the Gifts to Minors Act of Kentucky does not affect those transfers or those powers, duties, and immunities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 25, effective July 15, 1986.

385.252.
Short title.

KRS

385.012

to

385.242

may be cited as the “Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 24, effective July 15, 1986.